apertium-mt-ar.ar.dix
    <pardef n="عص/فور__n_m_nn"> 
        <e><p><l>فور</l><r>فور<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>فورا</l><r>فور<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>افير</l><r>فور<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ر/أس__n_m_nn">  
        <e><p><l>أس</l><r>أس<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>أس</l><r>أس<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__مدرس"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ؤوس</l><r>أس<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="م/اء__n_m_nn">  
        <e><p><l>اء</l><r>اء<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ياه</l><r>اء<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/وقت__n_m_nn">  
        <e><p><l>وقت</l><r>وقت<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>أوقات</l><r>أوقات<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/صوت__n_m_nn">  
        <e><p><l>صوت</l><r>صوت<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>صوتا</l><r>صوت<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>أصوات</l><r>أصوات<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>



    <!-- SECTION: Proper nouns -->

    <pardef n="مريم__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="جيمس__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->
    <pardef n="איך__adv">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="לא__adv" c="only used for 'not'">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="עכשיו__adv">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    
    <!-- SECTION: Adjectives -->

    <pardef n="صغ/ير__adj"> 
        <e><p><l>ير</l><r>ير<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>يرة</l><r>ير<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>يرة</l><r>ير<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ار</l><r>ير<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>راء</l><r>ير<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="جميل__adj"> 
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ا</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ة</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ون</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ات</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="قد/يم__adj"> 
        <e><p><l>يم</l><r>يم<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>يمة</l><r>يم<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>اما</l><r>يم<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>يمات</l><r>يم<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    
   
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="عصفور" c="bird" ><par n="ה"/><i>عص</i><par n="عص/فور__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="رأس" c="head" ><i>ر</i><par n="ر/أس__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="ماء" c="water" ><par n="ה"/><i>م</i><par n="م/اء__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="وقت" c="time" ><par n="ה"/><i></i><par n="/وقت__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="مريم"><i>مريم</i><par n="مريم__np"/></e>
    <e lm="جيمس"><i>جيمس</i><par n="جيمس__np"/></e>
    <e lm="صغير"><par n="ה"/><i>صغ</i><par n="صغ/ير__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="جميل"><par n="ה"/><i>جميل</i><par n="جميل__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="حار"><par n="ה"/><i>حار</i><par n="جميل__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="كبير"><par n="ה"/><i>كب</i><par n="صغ/ير__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="فرح"><par n="ה"/><i>فرح</i><par n="جميل__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="قديم"><par n="ה"/><i>قد</i><par n="قد/يم__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="منتبه"><par n="ה"/><i>منتبه</i><par n="جميل__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="أين"><i>أين</i><par n="איך__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="اليوم"><i>اليوم</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="امس"><i>امس</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="الخارج"><i>خارجا</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="الداخل"><i>داخلا</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="معا"><i>معا</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="طبعا"><i>طبعا</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ذاك اليوم"><i>ذاك<b/>اليوم</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="أيضا"><i>أيضا</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="دائما"><i>دائما</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="بسرعة" c="quickly"><i>بسرعة</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ببطء" c="slowly"><i>ببطء</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="الآن" c="now"><i>الآن</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="من المحتمل"><i>من<b/>المحتمل</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="حينئذ"><i>حينئذ</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="لذلك"><i>لذلك</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="لماذا" c="why"><i>لماذا</i><par n="איך__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="هكذا"><i>هكذا</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="لا"><i>لا</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="في كل مكان"><i>في<b/>كل<b/>مكان</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="هناك"><i>هناك</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="جيدا"><i>جيدا</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="بالتأكيد"><i>بالتأكيد</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="حول"><i>حول</i><par n="עכשיו__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="لم"><i>لم</i><par n="לא__adv"/></e>
